en: Blueberry jams
da: Blåbærsyltetøj
nb: Blåbærsyltetøy
sv: Blåbärssylter

en: Bilberry jams, Bilberries jams, Blaeberry jams, Blueberry jams (European)
bg: Конфитюр от черни боровинки
de: Heidelbeer-Konfitüren, Heidelbeermarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de arándanos, Mermeladas de arándanos, Mermeladas de arándano, Confituras de arándanos
fi: mustikkahillot
fr: Confitures de myrtilles
hr: Džemovi od borovnica
hu: Fekete áfonya lekvár
it: Confetture di mirtilli, Marmellate di mirtilli
nl: Bosbessenjams
pt: Doces de mirtilo

en: American blueberry jams, Blueberry jams (American)
zh: 美国蓝莓果酱

en: Lingonberries jams
de: Preiselbeeren Konfitüren
fr: Confitures d'airelles rouges
hr: Džemovi od brusnica
it: Confetture di mirtilli rossi, Marmellate di mirtilli rossi
sv: Lingonsylter, lingonsylt

en: Myrtles jams
fr: Confitures de myrtes
hr: Džemovi od mirte
it: Confetture di bacche di mirto, Confetture di mirti, Marmellate di mirti, Marmellate di bacche di mirto

en: Cloudberries jams
fi: Lakkahillot
fr: Confitures de plaquebières
hr: Džemovi od bobica
it: Confetture di camemoro, Marmellate di camemoro
sv: Hjortronsylter, htronsylt

en: Blackcurrant jams
bg: Конфитюр от касис
de: Johannisbeerkonfitüren, Johannisbeermarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de zarzaparrilla negra, Mermeladas de zarzaparrilla negra, Confituras de zarzaparrilla negra, Mermeladas y confituras de grosella negra, Mermeladas de grosella negra, Confituras de grosella negra
fi: mustaherukkahillot
fr: Confitures de cassis
hr: Džemovi od crnog ribiza
hu: Fekete ribizli lekvár
it: Confetture di ribes nero, Marmellate di ribes nero
nl: Cassisjams

en: Blackberry jams
bg: Конфитюр от къпини
de: Brombeermarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de mora, mermeladas de mora
fi: karhunvatukkahillot
fr: Confitures de mûres, Confitures de mûre, Confiture de mûres, Confiture de mûre
hr: Džemovi od kupina
hu: Földi szeder lekvár, Szeder lekvár
it: Confetture di more, Marmellate di more
ja: ブラックベリージャム
nl: Bramenjam, Bramenjams
pt: Doces de amora

en: Mixed berry jams
de: Gemischte Beerenmarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de frutas del bosque variadas, Mermeladas de frutas del bosque variadas, Confituras de frutas del bosque variadas
fi: marjahillosekoitukset
fr: Confitures de fruits rouges mélanges
hr: Džemovi od miješanog bobičastog voća
hu: Vegyes piros bogyós lekvárok
it: Confetture ai frutti di bosco, Marmellate ai frutti di bosco
nl: Jams van gemengde vruchten
pt: Compotas de mistura de bagas

en: Forest berry jams
nl: Bosvruchtenjams

en: Queen's jam
nb: Dronningsyltetøy
sv: Drottningsylter

en: Redcurrants jams
de: Rote Johannisbeere Konfitüren
es: Mermeladas y confituras de grosellas, Mermeladas de grosellas, Confituras de grosellas
fr: Confitures de groseilles
hr: Džemovi od crvenog ribiza
hu: Vörös ribizli lekvár
it: Confetture di ribes, Marmellate di ribes, Confetture di ribes rosso, Marmellate di ribes rosso
nl: Aalbessenjams
pt: Doces de groselha

en: Gooseberries jams, gooseberry jams
de: Stachelbeere Konfitüren
fr: Confitures de groseilles à maquereaux
hr: Džemovi od ogrozda
it: Confetture di uva-crispa, Confetture di uva crispa, Marmellate di uva crispa

en: Raspberry jams
bg: Конфитюр от малини
de: Himbeere Konfitüren, Himbeermarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de frambuesas, Mermeladas de frambuesas, Confituras de frambuesa
fi: vadelmahillot
fr: Confitures de framboises
he: ריבות פטל
hr: Džemovi od malina
hu: Málna lekvár
it: Confetture di lamponi, Marmellate di lamponi
ja: ラズベリージャム
nl: Frambozenjams
pt: Doces de framboesa
ru: Малиновое варенье
sv: Hallonsylter, hallonsylt
tr: Ahududu reçeli

en: Strawberry jams
bg: Конфитюр от ягоди
ca: Melmelades de maduixa
da: Jordbærsyltetøj, Jordbærmarmelade
de: Erdbeere Konfitüren, Erdbeermarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de fresa, Mermeladas de fresa, Confituras de fresa
fi: mansikkahillot
fr: Confitures de fraises
he: ריבות תותים
hr: Džemovi od jagoda
hu: Eper lekvár
it: Confetture di fragole, Marmellate di fragole
ja: イチゴジャム, いちごジャム, 苺ジャム, ストロベリージャム
nl: Aardbeienjams, Aardbeienjam
pl: Dżem truskawkowy
pt: Doces de morango
ru: Клубничные джемы
sv: Jordgubbssylter, jordgubbssylt

en: Cherry jams
bg: Конфитюр от череши
da: Kirsebærsyltetøj
de: Kirsche Konfitüren, Kirschmarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de cereza, Mermeladas de cereza, Confituras de cereza
fi: kirsikkahillot
fr: Confitures de cerises, Confiture de cerise extra
hr: Džemovi od višanja
hu: Cseresznye lekvár
it: Confetture di ciliegie, Marmellate di ciliegie
nl: Kersenjams
pt: Doces de cereja
sv: Körsbärsylter

en: Rhubarb-strawberry jams
fr: Confitures de fraise et de rhubarbe
it: Confetture di fragole e rabarbaro, Marmellate di fragole e rabarbaro
nl: Rabarber-aardbeien jams

en: Figs jams
bg: Конфитюр от смокини
de: Feigenkonfitüren
es: Mermeladas y confituras de higos, Mermeladas de higos, Confituras de higos
fi: viikunahillot
fr: Confitures de figues
hr: Džemovi od smokava
hu: Füge lekár, Füge dzsem
it: Confetture di fichi, Marmellate di fichi
ja: いちじくジャム, イチジクジャム
nl: Vijgenjams
pl: Dżem z fig, Dżem figowy
pt: Doces de figo
sv: Fikonsylter

en: Grape jams
bg: Конфитюр от грозде
es: Mermeladas y confituras de uvas, Mermeladas de uvas, Confituras de uvas
fr: Confitures de raisins
hr: Džemovi od grožđa
hu: Szölő lekvár
it: Confetture di uva, Marmellate di uva
ja: ぶどうジャム, ブドウジャム
nl: Druivenjams
pt: Doces de uva
sv: Druvasylter
tr: Üzüm reçeli

en: Kiwifruit jams, Kiwi jams, kiwi jam
de: Kiwi Konfitüren
es: Mermelada de kiwi
fr: Confitures de kiwi, confiture de kiwi, confitures de kiwis
hr: Džemovi od kivija
it: Confetture di kiwi, Marmellate di kiwi
ja: キウイジャム
sv: Kiwisylter